Idaho statutes. TITLE 34 ELECTIONS
CHAPTER 25
ELECTION CAMPAIGN FUND

Section.

34-2501. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 3, § 1, effective January 1, 2010.

34-2502. Election campaign fund

Creation. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 3, § 1, effective January 1, 2010.

34-2503. Election campaign fund

Distribution. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 3, § 1, effective January 1, 2010.

34-2504. Statement of expenditures filed before election day. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 3, § 1, effective January 1, 2010.

34-2505. Statement of expenditures — Rules — Unqualified expenditures

Unexpended balance. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 3, § 1, effective January 1, 2010.